Hawaii statutes.
§355-3 Enforcement. The courts,
departments, agencies, and officers of the State of Hawaii and its subdivisions
shall enforce this compact and shall do all things appropriate to the
effectuation of its purposes and intent which may be within their respective
jurisdictions including but not limited to the making and submission of such
reports as are required by the compact. [L 1965, c 118, §3; Supp, §83E-3; HRS
§355-3]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next